Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2658.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Technician 5th Grade Bernard C. Strohmier Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Bernard C. Strohmier was born April 9, 1924, in Loretto. He was raised on a farm between Chest Springs and Loretto.(2) Technician 5th Grade Strohmier attended St. Monica Catholic School before joining the army, serving as a Technician 5th Grade with the 589th Field Artillery Battalion, which served as support for the infantry.(3) After entering the Army on March 13, 1943, at Fort Jackson, South Carolina, he was assigned to Germany in 12345678910111213141516171819 October 1944.(4) While defending Parker's Crossroads during the Battle of the Bulge, Technician 5th Grade Strohmier was taken prisoner on December 24, 1944. He was processed through several German camps, including Prum, Gerolstein and Trier. During this time, he experienced extreme malnutrition, dehydration, dysentery and exposure to cold.(5) Technician 5th Grade Strohmier was liberated by the Ninth Armored Division after an Allied air attack. He received blood transfusion, plasma and intravenous transfusion of liquids in England and was then flown to the United States to receive rehabilitation before being discharged in July 1946. Technician 5th Grade Strohmier spent over one year in treatment and had lost 75 pounds during his internment, weighing 90 pounds on liberation.(6) After returning from service, he worked as a Guard at the Cambria County Prison and then as a rural mail carrier, retiring in 1979.(7) Technician 5th Grade Bernard C. Strohmier passed away at home in Loretto on January 10, 2021.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 8546, carrying State Route 1001 over RJ Corman Railroad in Allegheny Township, Cambria County, is designated as the Technician 5th Grade Bernard C. Strohmier Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2658PN3669 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829